Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.090

Administration of places of business—Direct management.

A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator must administer each of his, her, or its places of business under the direct management of an officer or an employee who is either:

(1) An attorney or certified public accountant admitted to practice in any state or territory of the United States; or

(2) A person who has passed a test specific to the subject matter of exchange facilitation.

[ 2009 c 70 s 10.]